Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.075

Petition for district outside city may be denied.

Whenever the formation of a local improvement district or utility local improvement district which lies entirely or in part outside of a city or town's corporate limits is initiated by petition the legislative authority of the city or town may by a majority vote deny the petition and refuse to form the local improvement district or utility local improvement district.

[ 1967 c 52 s 4; 1965 c 7 s 35.43.075. Prior: 1963 c 56 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.